csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omawadisaawaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omawadisaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimawadisimaanaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimawadisimaanaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlObv: mawadisimaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiidogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaadogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaadogenag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaa'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaanig
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaawag
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigosiinaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigosiiwaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiibaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omawadisigonaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimawadisaawaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaabane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omawadisigowaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimawadisaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimawadisaanaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaabaneg
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiwaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaasiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaawaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaanaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiwaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaasiiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaawaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaawan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiwaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaasiwaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaasiwaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaasiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omawadisaawaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omawadisaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimawadisimaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimawadisimaanaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv: mawadisimaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiinini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiinini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigonini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigonini
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigosiininaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omawadisigoninaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiidogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiidogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiidog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigonaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigodogena'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigodogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mawadisaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosii'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiin
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigoo'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigoon
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mawadisaa
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigosiinaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiibane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigosiibanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaasiwaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaasiwaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaasiiban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omawadisigonaabanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omawadisigonaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimawadisaawaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omawadisigobane'
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omawadisigobanen
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimawadisaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimawadisaanaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mawadisaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaadogenan
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimawadisigosiiminaadog
     mawadish+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimawadishisiiminaadog
